Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2303
Nebraska state-chartered trust company; out-of-state branch trust offices; authorized.

A Nebraska state-chartered trust company may establish and maintain branch trust offices in any other state in accordance with the laws of the other state and with the prior approval of the director. A Nebraska state-chartered trust company may conduct any activities at any branch trust office outside the State of Nebraska that are permissible for a trust company chartered by the host state where the branch trust office is located or for a national bank authorized to conduct a trust company business within the host state.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 56.